Illinois, session 104th, HB3287.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Medicare for All Health Care Act. 6    Section 5. Purposes. It is the purpose of this Act to 7provide universal access to health care for all individuals 8within the State, to promote and improve the health of all its 9citizens, to stress the importance of good public health 10through treatment and prevention of diseases, and to contain 11costs to make the delivery of this care affordable. Should 12legislation of this kind be enacted on a federal level, it is 13the intent of this Act to become a part of a nationwide system. 14    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:15    "Board" means the Illinois Health Services Governing 16Board. 17    "Program" means the Illinois Health Services Program.  18    Section 15. Eligibility; registration. All individuals 19residing in this State are covered under the Illinois Health 20Services Program for health insurance and shall receive a card 21with a unique number in the mail. An individual's social   HB3287- 2 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1security number shall not be used for purposes of registration 2under this Section. Individuals and families shall receive an 3Illinois Health Services Insurance Card in the mail after 4filling out a Program application form at a health care 5provider. Such application form shall be no more than 2 pages 6long. Individuals who present themselves for covered services 7from a participating provider shall be presumed to be eligible 8for benefits under this Act, but shall complete an application 9for benefits in order to receive an Illinois Health Services 10Insurance Card and have payment made for such benefits. 11    Section 20. Benefits and portability. 12    (a) The health coverage benefits under this Act cover all 13medically necessary services, including:14        (1) primary care and prevention;15        (2) specialty care (other than what is deemed elective 16    cosmetic);17        (3) inpatient care;18        (4) outpatient care;19        (5) emergency care;20        (6) prescription drugs;21        (7) durable medical equipment;22        (8) long-term care;23        (9) mental health services;24        (10) the full scope of dental services (other than 25    elective cosmetic dentistry);   HB3287- 3 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1        (11) substance abuse treatment services;2        (12) chiropractic services; and3        (13) basic vision care and vision correction.4    (b) Health coverage benefits under this Act are available 5through any licensed health care provider anywhere in the 6State that is legally qualified to provide such benefits and 7for emergency care anywhere in the United States.8    (c) No deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, or other cost 9sharing shall be imposed with respect to covered benefits 10except for those goods or services that exceed basic covered 11benefits, as defined by the Board. 12    Section 25. Qualification of participating providers. 13    (a) Health care delivery facilities must meet regional and 14State quality and licensing guidelines as a condition of 15participation under the Program, including guidelines 16regarding safe staffing and quality of care.17    (b) A participating health care provider must be licensed 18by the State. No health care provider whose license is under 19suspension or has been revoked may participate in the Program20    (c) Only non-profit health maintenance organizations that 21actually deliver care in their own facilities and directly 22employ clinicians may participate in the Program.23    (d) Patients shall have free choice of participating 24eligible providers, hospitals, and inpatient care facilities.   HB3287- 4 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1    Section 30. Provider reimbursement. 2    (a) The Program shall pay all health care providers 3according to the following standards:4        (1) Physicians and other practitioners can choose to 5    be paid fee-for-service, salaried by institutions 6    receiving global budgets, or salaried by group practices 7    or HMOs receiving capitation payments. Investor-owned HMOs 8    and group practices shall be converted to not-for-profit 9    status. Only institutions that deliver care shall be 10    eligible for Program payments.11        (2) The Program shall pay each hospital and providing 12    institution a monthly lump sum (global budget) to cover 13    all operating expenses. The hospital and Program shall 14    negotiate the amount of this payment annually based on 15    past budgets, clinical performance, projected changes in 16    demand for services and input costs, and proposed new 17    programs. Hospitals shall not bill patients for services 18    covered by the Program, and cannot use any of their 19    operating budgets for expansion, profit, excessive 20    executive income, marketing, or major capital purchases or 21    leases.22        (3) The Program budget shall fund major capital 23    expenditures, including the construction of new health 24    facilities and the purchase of expensive equipment. The 25    regional health planning districts shall allocate these 26    capital funds and oversee capital projects funded from   HB3287- 5 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1    private donations. 2    (b) The Program shall reimburse physicians choosing to be 3paid fee-for-service according to a fee schedule negotiated 4between physician representatives and the Program on at least 5an annual basis.6    (c) Hospitals, nursing homes, community health centers, 7non-profit staff model HMOs, and home health care agencies 8shall receive a global budget to cover operating expenses, 9negotiated annually with the Program based on past 10expenditures, past budgets, clinical performance, projected 11changes in demand for services and input costs, and proposed 12new programs. Expansions and other substantive capital 13investments shall be funded separately.14    (d) All covered prescription drugs and durable medical 15supplies shall be paid for according to a fee schedule 16negotiated between manufacturers and the Program on at least 17an annual basis. Price reductions shall be achieved by bulk 18purchasing whenever possible. Where therapeutically equivalent 19drugs are available, the formulary shall specify the use of 20the lowest-cost medication, with exceptions available in the 21case of medical necessity.  22    Section 35. Prohibition against duplicating coverage; 23investor-ownership of health delivery facilities. 24    (a) It is unlawful for a private health insurer to sell 25health insurance coverage that duplicates the benefits   HB3287- 6 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1provided under this Act. Nothing in this Act shall be 2construed as prohibiting the sale of health insurance coverage 3for any additional benefits not covered by this Act.4    (b) Investor-ownership of health delivery facilities, 5including hospitals, health maintenance organizations, nursing 6homes, and clinics, is unlawful. Investor-owners of health 7delivery facilities at the time of the effective date of this 8Act shall be compensated for the loss of their facilities, but 9not for loss of business opportunities or for administrative 10capacity not used by the Program. 11    Section 40. Illinois Health Services Trust. 12    (a) The State shall establish the Illinois Health Services 13Trust (IHST), the sole purpose of which shall be to provide the 14financing reserve for the purposes outlined in this Act. 15Specifically, the IHST shall provide all of the following:16        (1) The funds for the general operating budget of the 17    Program.18        (2) Reimbursement for those benefits outlined in 19    Section 20 of this Act.20        (3) Public health services.21        (4) Capital expenditures for construction or 22    renovation of health care facilities or major equipment 23    purchases deemed necessary throughout the State and 24    approved by the Board. 25        (5) Re-education and job placement of persons who have   HB3287- 7 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1    lost their jobs as a result of this transition, limited to 2    the first 5 years.3    (b) The General Assembly or the Governor may provide funds 4to the IHST, but may not remove or borrow funds from the IHST.5    (c) The IHST shall be administered by the Board, under the 6oversight of the General Assembly. 7    (d) Funding of the IHST shall include, but is not limited 8to, all of the following:9        (1) Funds appropriated as outlined by the General 10    Assembly on a yearly basis.11        (2) A progressive set of graduated income 12    contributions: 20% paid by individuals, 20% paid by a 13    business, and 60% paid by the government.14        (3) All federal moneys that are designated for health 15    care, including, but not limited to, all moneys designated 16    for Medicaid. The Secretary shall be authorized to 17    negotiate with the federal government for funding of 18    Medicare recipients. 19        (4) Grants and contributions, both public and private. 20        (5) Any other tax revenues designated by the General 21    Assembly.22        (6) Any other funds specifically ear-marked for health 23    care or health care education, such as settlements from 24    litigation. 25    (e) The total overhead and administrative portion of the 26Program budget may not exceed 12% of the total operating   HB3287- 8 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1budget of the Program for the first 2 years that the Program is 2in operation; 8% for the following 2 years; and 5% for each 3year thereafter.4    (f) The Program may be divided into regional districts for 5the purposes of local administration and oversight of programs 6that are specific to each region's needs. 7    (g) Claims billing from all providers must be submitted 8electronically and in compliance with current State and 9federal privacy laws within 5 years after the effective date 10of this Act. Electronic claims and billing must be uniform 11across the State. The Board shall create and implement a 12statewide uniform system of electronic medical records that is 13in compliance with current State and federal privacy laws 14within 7 years after the effective date of this Act. Payments 15to providers must be made in a timely fashion as outlined under 16current State and federal law. Providers who accept payment 17from the Program for services rendered may not bill any 18patient for covered services. Providers may elect either to 19participate fully, or not at all, in the Program.  20    Section 45. Long-term care payment. The Board shall 21establish funding for long-term care services, including 22in-home, nursing home, and community-based care. A local 23public agency shall be established in each community to 24determine eligibility and coordinate home and nursing home 25long-term care. This agency may contract with long-term care   HB3287- 9 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1providers for the full range of needed long-term care 2services. 3    Section 50. Mental health services. The Program shall 4provide coverage for all medically necessary mental health 5care on the same basis as the coverage for other conditions. 6The Program shall cover supportive residences, occupational 7therapy, and ongoing mental health and counseling services 8outside the hospital for patients with serious mental illness. 9In all cases the highest quality and most effective care shall 10be delivered, including institutional care. 11    Section 55. Payment for prescription medications, medical 12supplies, and medically necessary assistive equipment. 13    (a) The Program shall establish a single prescription drug 14formulary and list of approved durable medical goods and 15supplies. The Board shall, by itself or by a committee of 16health professionals and related individuals appointed by the 17Board and called the Pharmaceutical and Durable Medical Goods 18Committee, meet on a quarterly basis to discuss, reverse, add 19to, or remove items from the formulary according to sound 20medical practice.21    (b) The Pharmaceutical and Durable Medical Goods Committee 22shall negotiate the prices of pharmaceuticals and durable 23medical goods with suppliers or manufacturers on an open bid 24competitive basis. Prices shall be reviewed, negotiated, or   HB3287- 10 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1re-negotiated on no less than an annual basis. The 2Pharmaceutical and Durable Medical Goods Committee shall 3establish a process of open forum to the public for the 4purposes of grievance and petition from suppliers, provider 5groups, and the public regarding the formulary no less than 2 6times a year.7    (c) All pharmacy and durable medical goods vendors must be 8licensed to distribute medical goods through the regulations 9outlined by the Board.10    (d) All decisions and determinations of the Pharmacy and 11Durable Medical Goods Committee must be presented to and 12approved by the Board on an annual basis. 13    Section 60. Illinois Health Services Governing Board. 14    (a) The Program shall be administered by an independent 15agency known as the Illinois Health Services Governing Board. 16The Board will consist of a Commissioner, a Chief Medical 17Officer, and public State board members. The Board is 18responsible for administration of the Program, including: 19        (1) implementation of eligibility standards and 20    Program enrollment;21        (2) adoption of the benefits package; 22        (3) establishing formulas for setting health 23    expenditure budgets;24        (4) administration of global budgets, capital 25    expenditure budgets, and prompt reimbursement of   HB3287- 11 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1    providers;2        (5) negotiations of service fee schedules and prices 3    for prescription drugs and durable medical supplies;4        (6) recommending evidence-based changes to benefits; 5    and6        (7) quality and planning functions including criteria 7    for capital expansion and infrastructure development, 8    measurement and evaluation of health quality indicators, 9    and the establishment of regions for long-term care 10    integration. 11    (b) At least one-third of the members of the Board, 12including all committees dedicated to benefits design, health 13planning, quality, and long-term care, shall be consumer 14representatives. 15    Section 65. Patients' rights. The Program shall protect 16the rights and privacy of the patients that it serves in 17accordance with all current State and federal statutes. With 18the development of the electronic medical records, patients 19shall be afforded the right and option of keeping any portion 20of their medical records separate from the electronic medical 21records. Patients have the right to access their medical 22records upon demand. 23    Section 70. Compensation. The Commissioner, the Chief 24Medical Officer, public State board members, and subsequent   HB3287- 12 -LRB104 09569 KTG 19632 b1employees of the Program shall be compensated in accordance 2with the current pay scale for State employees and as deemed 3professionally appropriate by the General Assembly and 4reviewed in accordance with all other State employees.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 61, 2026.